North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12 Corrections, Parole, and Probation
CHAPTER 12-62 Criminal Justice Training and Statistics Division

12-62-01.
Criminal justice training and statistics — Personnel — Purpose.

Criminal justice training and the collection of statistics must be conducted by the office of attorney general. The office of attorney general shall conduct the training of peace officers and sheriffs and gather, analyze, and disseminate information regarding the state’s criminal justice system.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 154, § 1; 2003, ch. 101, § 1.

12-62-01.1.
County and city officials to furnish crime statistics.

To assist in controlling crime in the state through the use of reliable statistics relating to crimes and criminal activity, the attorney general may obtain from the clerks of district courts, municipal courts, and criminal justice agencies all information the attorney general deems necessary to ascertain the status of crimes and criminal activity in North Dakota. It is the duty of the officials to furnish the information requested by the attorney general within thirty days of the request on whatever forms or in whatever manner the attorney general may prescribe.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 556, § 3; 1991, ch. 326, § 40; 2003, ch. 101, § 2; 2009, ch. 125, § 1.

12-62-02.
Powers and duties.

To ensure adequate training for law enforcement and to ensure the comprehensive collection of crime statistics the attorney general shall:

Determine the specialized training needs of peace officers and conduct such training.

Develop and maintain a staffing, training, and certification information system.

Analyze criminal justice data and compile appropriate periodic reports.

Coordinate the utilization of data generated by state and local record information systems.

Conduct research projects designed to respond to criminal justice system needs and executive, judicial, or legislative branch requests.

Accept and administer gifts, or grants, or contracts with persons or organizations, including the federal government, on such terms as may be beneficial to the state.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 154, § 2; 2003, ch. 101, § 3.

12-62-03.
Peace officer standards and training board — Membership — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 101, § 17.

12-62-04.
Qualified officers to be certified. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 120, § 1.

12-62-05.
State’s attorneys — Training. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 101, § 17.

12-62-06.
Correctional officers — Training. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 101, § 17.

12-62-07.
Sheriffs — Training.

Every newly elected or appointed sheriff shall attend within the first year of employment a course of training on civil duties conducted by the office of attorney general. The curriculum, location, and dates shall be determined by the office of attorney general in cooperation with the sheriff’s association. The course shall be open to all sheriffs and deputies.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 154, § 7; 2003, ch. 101, § 4.

12-62-08.
Peace officers — Training. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 120, § 1.

12-62-09.
Defense attorneys — Training. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 101, § 17.

12-62-10.
Rulemaking power.

The attorney general may adopt rules to carry out the powers and duties designated in this chapter. All rules adopted by the attorney general and appeals therefrom shall be in accordance with chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 154, § 10; 2003, ch. 101, § 5.